North Carolina, session 2025, SB515.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1. G.S. 87-1 reads as rewritten:
"§ 87-1. "General contractor" defined; exceptions.
(a) For the purpose of this Article any person or firm or corporation who for a fixed price,
commission, fee, or wage, undertakes to bid upon or to construct or who undertakes to
superintend or manage, on his own behalf or for any person, firm, or corporation that is not
licensed as a general contractor pursuant to this Article, the construction of any building,
highway, public utilities, grading or any improvement or structure where the cost of the
undertaking is forty thousand dollars ($40,000) or more, or undertakes to erect a North Carolina
labeled manufactured modular building meeting the North Carolina State Building Code, shall
be deemed to be a "general contractor" engaged in the business of general contracting in the State
of North Carolina.
(b) This section shall not apply to the following:
(1) Persons, firms, or corporations furnishing or erecting industrial equipment,
power plan plant equipment, radial brick chimneys, and monuments.
(2) Any person, firm, or corporation who constructs or alters a building on land
owned by that person, firm, or corporation provided (i) the building is
intended solely for occupancy by that person and his family, firm, or
corporation after completion; and (ii) the person, firm, or corporation
complies with G.S. 87-14. If the building is not occupied solely by the person
and his family, firm, or corporation for at least 12 months following
completion, it shall be presumed that the person, firm, or corporation did not
intend the building solely for occupancy by that person and his family, firm,
or corporation.
(3) Any person engaged in the business of farming who constructs or alters a
building on land owned by that person and used in the business of farming,
when the building is intended for use by that person after completion.
(4) Any person, firm, or corporation constructing, furnishing, or erecting signs,
awnings, or related architectural features and is UL certified."
SECTION 2. G.S. 87-14 reads as rewritten:
"§ 87-14. Regulations as to issue of building permits.
*S515-v-1*

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
(a) Any person, firm, or corporation, upon making application to the building inspector
or other authority of any incorporated city, town, or county in North Carolina charged with the
duty of issuing building or other permits for the construction of any building, highway, sewer,
grading, or any improvement or structure where the cost is to be forty thousand dollars ($40,000)
or more, shall, before being entitled to a permit, satisfy the following:
(1) Furnish satisfactory proof to the inspector or authority that the applicant
seeking the permit or another person contracting to superintend or manage the
construction is licensed under this Article to carry out or superintend the
construction or is exempt from licensure under G.S. 87-1(b). If an applicant
claims an exemption from licensure pursuant to G.S. 87-1(b)(2), the applicant
for the building permit shall execute a verified affidavit attesting to the
following:
a. That the applicant is the owner of the property on which the building
is being constructed and, if the applicant is a firm or corporation, that
the person submitting the application is an owner, officer, or member
of the firm or corporation that owns the property.
b. That the applicant will personally superintend and manage all aspects
of the construction of the building and that the duty will not be
delegated to any other person not licensed under this Article.
c. That the applicant will be personally present for all inspections
required by the North Carolina State Building Code, unless the plans
for the building were drawn and sealed by an architect licensed
pursuant to Chapter 83A of the General Statutes.
The building inspector or other authority shall transmit a copy of the affidavit
to the Board, which shall verify that the applicant was validly entitled to claim
the exemption under G.S. 87-1(b)(2). If the Board determines that the
applicant was not entitled to claim the exemption under G.S. 87-1(b)(2), the
building permit shall be revoked pursuant to G.S. 160D-1115.
(1a) If an applicant claims an exemption from licensure pursuant to
G.S. 87-1(b)(4), the applicant for the building permit shall provide
documentation demonstrating that the person, firm, or corporation is currently
UL certified for sign manufacturing. The applicant shall execute a verified
affidavit attesting to these facts. The building inspector or other authority shall
transmit a copy of the affidavit and documentation to the Board, which shall
verify that the applicant was validly entitled to claim the exemption under
G.S. 87-1(b)(4). If the Board determines that the applicant was not entitled to
claim the exemption under G.S. 87-1(b)(4), the building permit shall be
revoked pursuant to G.S. 160D-1115.
(2) Furnish proof that the applicant has in effect Workers' Compensation
insurance as required by Chapter 97 of the General Statutes.
(3) Redesignated as subsection (a1) by Session Laws 2022-62, s. 8, effective July
8, 2022.
(a1) Any person, firm, or corporation, upon making application to the building inspector
or other authority of any incorporated city, town, or county in North Carolina charged with the
duty of issuing building permits pursuant to G.S. 160D-1110 for any improvements for which
the combined cost is to be forty thousand dollars ($40,000) or more, other than for improvements
to an existing single-family residential dwelling unit as defined in G.S. 87-15.5(7) that the owner
occupies as a residence, or for the addition of an accessory building or accessory structure as
defined in the North Carolina Uniform Residential Building Code, the use of which is incidental
to that residential dwelling unit, shall be required to provide to the building inspector or other
Page 2 Senate Bill 515-First Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
authority the name, physical and mailing address, telephone number, facsimile number, and
email address of the lien agent designated by the owner pursuant to G.S. 44A-11.1(a).
(b) It is unlawful for the building inspector or other authority to issue or allow the
issuance of a building permit pursuant to this section unless and until the applicant has furnished
evidence that the applicant has complied with subsection (a) of this section. Any building
inspector or other authority that is subject to and violates this section is guilty of a Class 3
misdemeanor and subject only to a fine of not more than fifty dollars ($50.00)."
SECTION 3. This act is effective when it becomes law.
Senate Bill 515-First Edition Page 3